Maine, session 132, LD1295.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 25 MRSA §2804-C, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2013, c. 147, §29, is further
amended to read:
1. Required. As a condition to the continued employment of any person as a full-time
law enforcement officer by a municipality, a county, the State or any other nonfederal
employer, that person must successfully complete, within the first 12 months of initial full-
time employment, the basic training course at the Maine Criminal Justice Academy
approved by the board. If a person's failure to comply with this requirement was a result
of that person's failure to satisfy any of the admission standards applicable to the basic
training course and that person is subsequently employed as a full-time law enforcement
officer within 12 months of termination of the initial employment by a municipality, a
county, the State or any other nonfederal employer, the person must have satisfied all the
admission standards established by the board prior to the time of hire. As a condition of
continued employment as a full-time law enforcement officer, the officer must
satisfactorily maintain the basic certification by completing the recertification requirements
prescribed by the board. The board, under extenuating and emergency circumstances in
individual cases, may extend the 12-month period for not more than 180 days. The board
also, in individual cases, may shall waive the basic training requirement when the facts
indicate that an equivalent course has been successfully completed.
Sec. 2. Maine Criminal Justice Academy; study law enforcement training
requirement waiver. The Board of Trustees of the Maine Criminal Justice Academy
shall conduct a study and develop recommendations regarding the waiver of the basic law
enforcement training requirement in individual cases pursuant to the Maine Revised
Statutes, Title 25, section 2804-C, subsection 1. In conducting the study, the board shall
focus on reducing unnecessary or burdensome requirements that would prevent a law
enforcement officer who has completed an equivalent training course from qualifying for
the waiver. No later than December 3, 2025, the board shall submit a report containing the
findings and recommendations of the study, including any proposed legislation, to the Joint
Standing Committee on Criminal Justice and Public Safety. After reviewing the report, the
committee may report out legislation relating to the report to the Second Regular Session
of the 132nd Legislature.